Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.360

Judicial review of agency action—Payment of fees and expenses—Report to office of financial management.

Fees and other expenses awarded under RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 shall be paid by the agency over which the party prevails from operating funds appropriated to the agency within sixty days. Agencies paying fees and other expenses pursuant to RCW 4.84.340 and 4.84.350 shall report all payments to the office of financial management within five days of paying the fees and other expenses. Fees and other expenses awarded by the court shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 39.76 RCW and shall be deemed payable on the date the court announces the award.

[ 1995 c 403 s 904.]

NOTES:

Findings—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 4.84.340.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.